Utah statutes.
41-6a-1407.   Removal of unattended vehicles prohibited without authorization -- Penalties.

(1)  In cases not amounting to burglary or theft of a vehicle, a person may not remove an unattended vehicle without prior authorization of:

(a)  a peace officer;

(b)  a law enforcement agency;

(c)  a highway authority having jurisdiction over the highway on which there is an unattended vehicle; or

(d)  the owner or person in lawful possession or control of the real property.

(2) (a)  An authorization from a person specified under Subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c) shall be in a form specified by the Motor Vehicle Division.

(b)  The removal of the unattended vehicle shall comply with requirements of Section 41-6a-1406.

(3)  The removal of the unattended vehicle authorized under Subsection (1)(d) shall comply with requirements of Section 72-9-603.

(4)  A person who violates Subsection (1) or (3) is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

